Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.490

Civil infractions—Monetary penalty—Failure to pay, misdemeanor.

(1) Any person found to have committed a civil infraction under this chapter shall be assessed a monetary penalty. No monetary penalty so assessed may exceed five thousand dollars. The director shall adopt a schedule of monetary penalties for each violation of this chapter classified as a civil infraction and shall submit the schedule to the proper courts. Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by the court, the penalty is immediately due and payable. The court may, at its discretion, grant an extension of time, not to exceed thirty days, in which the penalty must be paid.

(2) Failure to pay any monetary penalties imposed under this chapter is a misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 395 s 9; 2003 c 53 s 162; 1986 c 178 s 5.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2003 c 53 s 162 and by 2003 c 395 s 9, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.